Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-239.01
Partnership; indemnification authorized.

Subject to such standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in its partnership agreement, a limited partnership may indemnify and hold harmless any partner or other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever.

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 12.